Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 657B.430 is amended to read:
657B.430. (1) The  Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insur-
ance Fund is declared to be a trust fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund from  contributions made under ORS
657B.150 and from penalties, fees, revenues and all other amounts deposited in  or credited to the
fund. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Director of the Employment De-
partment and may be used solely to:
(a) Carry out the purposes set forth in this chapter, including the  payment of administrative
costs and expenses that the director incurs in carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and
(b) Pay the  compensation of the Director of the Employment Department in accordance with
ORS 657.608.
(4)(a) To ensure compliance with tax  reporting and withholding requirements, the direc-
tor may adopt rules establishing an accounting system for contributions made to  and bene-
fits paid from the fund. The accounting system may include a method for:
(A) Allocating moneys from  the fund for the payment of benefits by type of qualifying
leave available under this chapter; and
(B) Restricting the use of moneys for  the payment of benefits for a specific type of leave
to moneys received solely from employee contributions, solely  from employer contributions
or a combination of employee and employer  contributions in a manner determined by the
director.
(b) Nothing in this  subsection shall be construed as authorizing the director to change
the percentage of the total  rate of contributions required to be paid by employers and em-
ployees under ORS 657B.150 beyond the authority granted to the director under ORS 657B.150
(1).
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 20, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-INTRO) Page 2